Hawaii statutes.
[§171-36.1] Reservation of rights to
prehistoric and historic remains on leased public lands. The board of land
and natural resources shall, in leases of public lands retain the rights to all
prehistoric and historic remains found on such lands. [L 1969, c 216, §7]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next